Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 5. Specific Acts and Types of Insurance.

Sec. 21.36.430.
Insurance for domestic violence victims and providers of services to victims; records.

A person transacting insurance in this state may not (1) refuse to issue or renew insurance coverage; (2) limit the scope of insurance coverage; (3) cancel an existing policy of insurance; (4) deny a covered claim; or (5) increase the premium on an insurance policy if the refusal, cancellation, denial, or increase results only from the fact that the person was a victim of domestic violence or a provider of services to victims of domestic violence.

The provisions of (a) of this section may not prevent an insurer from underwriting or rating

for a medical condition, including a medical condition resulting from domestic violence, in the same manner as it would for a person who is not a victim of domestic violence; or

a person based on known frequency of losses in the same manner the insurer would for a person who is not a victim of domestic violence.

In this section, “domestic violence” means the occurrence of one or more of the following by a current or former family member, household member, intimate partner, or caretaker:

attempting to cause, causing, or threatening another person with physical harm, severe emotional distress, psychological trauma, rape, or sexual assault;

engaging in a course of conduct or repeatedly committing acts toward another person, including following the person without proper authority, under circumstances that place the person in reasonable fear of bodily injury or physical harm;

subjecting another person to false imprisonment; or

attempting to cause or causing damage to property so as to intimidate or attempt to control the behavior of another person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1997; am §§ 73, 74 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Sec. 21.36.440.
Required disclosure for failure to provide coverage to an applicant.

An insurer who refuses to provide insurance coverage to an applicant initially applying for insurance shall

inform the applicant that the applicant has a right to know the reason for the refusal; and

upon receipt of a written request from the applicant, provide a written explanation of the refusal to the applicant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1997)

Sec. 21.36.450.
Definition of insurer for AS 21.36.430 — 21.36.440.

In AS

21.36.430

—

21.36.440

, “insurer” includes

an insurer, as defined in AS

21.97.900

;

a group health plan, as defined in 29 U.S.C. 1167(1) (Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974);

a health maintenance organization, as defined in AS

21.86.900

;

a hospital service corporation or medical service corporation, as defined in AS

21.87.330

;

the Comprehensive Health Insurance Association, established in AS

21.55.010

; and

an entity offering a service benefit plan, as referred to in 42 U.S.C. 1396g-1.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in paragraph (1), “AS

21.97.900

” was substituted for “AS

21.90.900

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.90.900

.

Sec. 21.36.460.
Uses of and restrictions on credit history or insurance scoring applicable to personal insurance.

If an insurer writing personal insurance uses credit information in underwriting or rating a consumer, the insurer shall disclose, either on the insurance application or at the time the insurance application is taken, and at the time of renewal, that the insurer will obtain credit information in connection with the application or renewal. The disclosure required under this subsection shall be in writing or in the same medium as the application for insurance or the notice of renewal. Use of the following statement constitutes compliance with this subsection: “In connection with this application for insurance or notice of renewal, we will review your credit report or obtain or use a credit-based insurance score based on the information contained in your credit report. We may use this information to decide whether to insure you or how much to charge.” If an insurer uses a third party to calculate the consumer’s insurance score, the disclosure required under this subsection must also contain language similar to: “We may use a third party in connection with the development of your insurance score.”

An insurer that takes adverse action involving personal insurance against a consumer based in whole or in part on credit history or insurance score shall provide notice of the adverse action, in writing, to the consumer. The notice must

clearly and specifically state the significant factors of the credit history or insurance score that resulted in the adverse action, in a manner that allows the consumer to identify the basis for the adverse action;

inform the consumer that the consumer is entitled to

request reconsideration of the adverse action; and

a free copy of the consumer’s report under 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq. (Fair Credit Reporting Act);

inform the consumer that the consumer has the right to correct errors in the credit report;

advise the consumer on ways to improve the consumer’s insurance score;

provide information to assist the consumer with the error correction process; and

inform the consumer

that reasonable exceptions to the insurer’s rates, rating classifications, company or tier placement, or underwriting rules or guidelines are available for a consumer who has experienced, and whose credit history has been affected by, one or more extraordinary life circumstances listed under AS

21.36.461

;

how the consumer may request an exception from the insurer; and

that, for a request for an exception to be considered by the insurer, the consumer must submit the request to the insurer not later than 60 days after receiving the notice under this subsection.

An insurer may use a consumer’s credit history or insurance score to cancel, deny, nonrenew, underwrite, or rate personal insurance only in combination with other substantive underwriting factors. If an insurer uses a consumer’s credit history or insurance score, not later than 24 months after the insurer most recently used the consumer’s credit history or insurance score to underwrite or rate a policy, the insurer shall reunderwrite and rerate the policy based on the consumer’s current

credit history or insurance score and current risk characteristics; or

risk characteristics but not including, in whole or in part, the consumer’s credit history or insurance score; for the purposes of this subsection,

refusal to offer personal insurance coverage to a consumer constitutes denial of personal insurance; and

an offer of placement with an affiliate insurer does not constitute denial of coverage.

An insurer may not

cancel, deny, nonrenew, underwrite, or rate personal insurance coverage based in whole or in part on

the absence of credit history or the inability to determine the consumer’s credit history if the insurer has received accurate and complete information from the consumer; this subparagraph does not apply if the insurer treats the consumer as if the consumer had neutral credit information as approved by the director;

credit inquiries not initiated by the consumer;

credit inquiries relating to insurance coverage if identified on a consumer’s credit report;

credit inquiries by the consumer for the consumer’s own credit information;

multiple lender inquiries if coded on the consumer’s credit report as being for automobile, boat, recreation vehicle, or home mortgage loans, unless all inquiries under that code within a 30-day period are counted as one;

credit history or an insurance score based on collection accounts identified with a medical industry code;

the consumer’s use of a particular type of credit card, charge card, or debit card or the absence of a credit card;

the consumer’s total available line of credit; however, the consumer’s ratio of debt to total available line of credit may be considered;

the age of the most recent automobile or home loan obtained by the consumer; however, an insurer may consider the bill payment history or total number of loans; or

the person’s age when credit is established;

use the credit history of the consumer when the consumer is adversely affected by a joint account owner who was the spouse of the consumer or a joint account owner who is the spouse of the consumer and who is a party to a divorce or dissolution action against the consumer; this paragraph applies only if the consumer provides written notice to the insurer that identifies the credit information that is adversely affected by the joint account owner; this paragraph does not prevent the use of credit history that is not identified by the consumer as required by this paragraph;

use an insurance score that is calculated using the income, age, sex, address, zip code, census block, ethnic group, religion, marital status, or nationality of the consumer as a factor;

use credit history to cancel, deny, nonrenew, underwrite, or rate a personal insurance policy if the history is obtained more than 90 days before the policy is cancelled, denied, nonrenewed, underwritten, or rated; this paragraph does not require an insurer to reevaluate a consumer’s credit history more frequently than is required under (c) of this section;

use an insurance score derived from an insurance scoring model to determine eligibility for an insurance payment plan; this paragraph does not prohibit the use of credit history to evaluate the ability of the consumer to make payments.

If incorrect credit history is used to underwrite or rate personal insurance coverage and a consumer is charged higher premiums or offered less favorable policy terms due to the disputed credit history, the insurer shall reissue or rerate the policy retroactive to the effective date of the current policy term, and the policy, as reissued or rerated, shall provide premiums and policy terms the consumer would have been eligible for if accurate credit history had been used to underwrite or rate the policy. If an insurer determines that the insured has overpaid a premium, the insurer shall refund to the insured the amount of overpayment calculated back to the last 12 months of coverage or the actual policy period, whichever period is shorter. This subsection applies only if the consumer discovers the incorrect credit history within 12 months after the policy is issued, resolves the dispute as described under (f) of this section or under the process in 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq. (Fair Credit Reporting Act), and notifies the insurer in writing that the dispute has been resolved.

If the use of disputed credit history results in denial or cancellation of personal insurance coverage, an insurer shall reunderwrite the coverage without the use of credit information as a factor. This subsection applies only if, within 10 days following denial or cancellation, the consumer provides a reconsideration certification to the insurer that sets forth any items of the credit history that are disputed and that indicates that the consumer has initiated the dispute resolution process in 15 U.S.C. 1681 (Fair Credit Reporting Act) by requesting a copy of the consumer’s credit report. An insurer’s reconsideration certification form

is subject to filing and approval by the director under AS

21.42.120

; and

shall be provided by an insurer to the consumer at the time of denial or cancellation.

This section does not require an insurer to use credit history for any purpose.

An insurer shall indemnify, defend, and hold the insurer’s producers harmless from all liability, fees, and costs arising out of or relating to the actions, errors, or omissions of an insurance producer who obtains or uses credit information or insurance scores for an insurer if the insurance producer follows the instructions of or procedures established by the insurer and complies with any applicable law or regulation. This subsection does not provide a consumer or other insured with a cause of action that does not exist in the absence of this subsection.

In this section,

“adverse action” has the meaning given in 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq. (Fair Credit Reporting Act) and includes

cancellation, denial, or failure to renew personal insurance coverage;

charging a higher insurance premium for personal insurance than would have been offered if the credit history or insurance score had been more favorable, whether the charge is by

application of a rating rule;

assignment to a rating tier that does not have the lowest available rates; or

placement with an affiliate company that does not offer the lowest rates available to the consumer within the affiliate group of insurance companies; or

any reduction or adverse or unfavorable change in the terms of coverage or amount of personal insurance due to a consumer’s credit history or insurance score; a reduction or adverse or unfavorable change in the terms of coverage occurs when

coverage provided to the consumer is not as broad in scope as coverage requested by the consumer but available to other insureds of the insurer or any affiliate; or

the consumer is not eligible for benefits that are available through affiliate insurers;

“affiliate” has the meaning given in AS

21.22.200

;

“consumer” means an individual policyholder or applicant for insurance;

“consumer report” has the meaning given in 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq. (Fair Credit Reporting Act);

“credit history” means written, oral, or other communication of information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity that is used or expected to be used, or collected in whole or in part, for the purpose of serving as a factor in determining personal insurance premiums or eligibility for coverage;

“insurance score” means a number or rating that is derived from an algorithm, computer application, model, or other process that is based in whole or in part on credit history;

“personal insurance” means

private passenger automobile or motorcycle coverage;

homeowner coverage, including mobile homeowner’s, manufactured homeowner’s, condominium owner’s, and renter’s coverage;

dwelling property coverage;

earthquake coverage for a residence or personal property;

personal liability and theft coverage;

personal property inland marine coverage;

personal boat, watercraft, snowmobile, and recreational vehicle coverage; and

umbrella insurance coverage.

History.

(§ 2 ch 150 SLA 2003; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 3 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 3, SLA 2018 (HB 195), which amended this section, see 2017 House Journal 731 — 733.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 25, 2018, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “and at the time of renewal,” following “insurance application is taken,”, added “or renewal” at the end, and made a related change; in the second and third sentences inserted “or notice of renewal” following “application for insurance”; in the last sentence, substituted “the consumer’s insurance score” for “the applicant’s insurance score”; in (b), near the end of the introductory language, substituted “provide notice of the adverse action, in writing, to the consumer” for “provide the consumer the opportunity to request reconsideration of the adverse action and provide written notice to the applicant or named insured”, added (b)(6), and made related changes; rewrote (c) and (d).

Sec. 21.36.461.
Extraordinary life circumstances.

Except as provided in AS

21.36.460(d)

, an insurer that uses a consumer’s credit history or insurance score shall provide reasonable exceptions to the insurer’s rates, rating classifications, company or tier placement, or underwriting rules or guidelines for a consumer who has experienced, and whose credit history or insurance score has been affected by, one or more of the following extraordinary life circumstances:

a catastrophe, as declared by the director under AS

21.06.080

;

a serious illness or injury, or a serious illness of or injury to an immediate family member;

the death of a spouse, child, or parent;

divorce or the involuntary interruption of spousal support or maintenance payments;

identity theft;

loss of employment for three months or more as a result of involuntary termination;

military overseas deployment; or

other extraordinary life circumstances where a prudent person would consider an exception to the insurer’s rates, rating classifications, company or tier placement, or underwriting rules or guidelines to be reasonable.

If a consumer submits a request for an exception under AS

21.36.460(b)

, an insurer may require the consumer to

provide reasonable written and independently verifiable documentation of the extraordinary life circumstances;

demonstrate that the circumstances had a direct and meaningful effect on the consumer’s credit information.

If a consumer submits a request for an exception under AS

21.36.460(b)

, an insurer may

grant an exception;

grant an exception if the consumer asks for consideration of repeated events; and

grant an exception if the insurer previously had considered a request.

An insurer may not be considered out of compliance with a law or rule relating to underwriting, rating, or rate filing as a result of granting an exception under this section.

Not later than 30 days after the insurer receives sufficient documentation of the information requested from the consumer under (b) of this section, the insurer shall provide notice to the consumer, in writing, that the exception is

granted and the adverse action will not be taken; or

denied and the adverse action will be maintained.

If an exception is denied and the adverse action will be maintained, the insurer’s notice under (e) of this section must include

the insurer’s reason for denying the request for an exception and for maintaining the adverse action; and

information notifying the consumer of the consumer’s right to appeal the adverse action resulting from the denial of the consumer’s request for an exception to the director.

A consumer, aggrieved by an adverse action resulting from the denial of the consumer’s request for an exception may appeal the adverse action to the director not later than 30 days after receiving the insurer’s notice under (e) of this section. The appeal must include the consumer’s reason for opposing the adverse action and for requesting the exception.

The director shall make a decision on the consumer’s appeal not later than 30 days after receiving the appeal and shall provide the decision to both the insurer and the consumer. The decision must include an explanation of the decision and must be based on

what a prudent person would consider to be a fair and reasonable decision given the consumer’s circumstances; and

the record, which must be limited to the following:

the insurer’s notice of adverse action provided to the consumer under AS

21.36.460(b)

;

the consumer’s request for an exception submitted to the insurer under AS

21.36.460(b)

;

any information submitted by the consumer to the insurer under (b) of this section;

the insurer’s notice provided to the consumer under (e) of this section;

the consumer’s appeal submitted to the director under (g) of this section; and

if requested by the director, additional information necessary to make a fair and reasonable decision.

The hearing and appeal procedures provided for in AS

21.06.180

—

21.06.230

do not apply to consumer appeals submitted to the director under (g) of this section.

Nothing in this section may be construed to provide a consumer with a cause of action that does not exist in the absence of this section.

In this section,

“adverse action” is limited to an adverse action defined in AS

21.36.460(i)

that is based, in whole or in part, on the consumer’s credit history or insurance score as affected by one or more extraordinary life circumstances;

“consumer” has the meaning given in AS

21.36.460(i)

.

History.

(§ 5 ch 3 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 3, SLA 2018 (HB 195), which amended this section, see 2017 House Journal 731 — 733.

Effective dates. —

Section 5,
ch. 3, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on June 25, 2018.

Sec. 21.36.465.
Notice of limited motor vehicle insurance.

An insurance policy that provides coverage only against property damage to a motor vehicle and that does not provide liability coverage required under AS

28.22.101(d)

must contain the following statement printed in bold face type: “This policy provides insurance only against damage to the motor vehicle. This policy does not insure against bodily injury, death, or property damage liability and does not satisfy the mandatory motor vehicle liability insurance requirements of AS

28.22.011

.”

If the insured under a policy described in (a) of this section is not the owner of the motor vehicle, the insurer shall provide a copy of the policy to the owner.

History.

(§ 2 ch 108 SLA 1989)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.045

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.470.
Violation of viatical settlement provisions prohibited.

A person may not violate the viatical settlement transaction provisions of AS

21.96.110

or regulations adopted under AS

21.96.110

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2000)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.055

.
Renumbered in 2010, at which time “AS

21.96.110

” was substituted for “AS 21.89.110” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.110.

Sec. 21.36.475.
Limitation on owner controlled and contractor controlled insurance programs.

An owner controlled insurance program or a contractor controlled insurance program is subject to both AS 21.39 and AS 21.42, must be approved by the director, and shall be allowed only for a major construction project. Owner controlled and contractor controlled insurance programs are limited to property insurance as defined in AS

21.12.060

and casualty insurance as defined in AS

21.12.070

.

In this section, an owner controlled or contractor controlled insured program does not include

builder’s risk or course of construction insurance;

insurance relating to the transportation of cargo or other property;

insurance covering one or more affiliates, subsidiaries, partners, or joint venture partners of a person; or

insurance policies endorsed to name one or more persons as additional insureds.

In this section,

“contractor” means a person who meets the definition of “contractor” in AS

08.18.171

and who undertakes the performance of a construction project for a project owner, its agent, or its representative;

“contractor controlled insurance program” means an insurance program where one or more insurance policies are procured on behalf of a contractor, its agent, or its representative, by its insurance producer, as defined in AS

21.27.990

, for the purpose of insuring the contractor and one or more of the following:

the project owner;

a subcontractor;

an architect;

an engineer; or

a person performing professional services;

“major construction project” means the process of constructing a structure, building, facility, or roadway or major renovation of more than 50 percent of an existing structure, building, facility, or roadway having a contract cost of more than $50,000,000 of a definite term at a geographically defined project site;

“owner controlled insurance program” means an insurance program where one or more insurance policies are procured on behalf of a project owner, its agent, or its representative, by its insurance producer, as defined in AS

21.27.990

, for the purpose of insuring the project owner and one or more of the following:

the contractor;

a subcontractor;

an architect;

an engineer; or

a person performing professional services;

“project owner” means a person who, in the course of the person’s business, engages the service of a contractor for the purpose of working on a construction project;

“subcontractor” means a person to whom a contractor sublets all or part of a contractor’s initial undertaking.

History.

(§ 23 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.065

.
Renumbered in 2010.

In 2018, “AS

21.27.990

” was substituted for “AS 21.27.900” in paragraphs (c)(2) and (4) to reflect the renumbering of that section.

Sec. 21.36.480.
Genetic information nondiscrimination.

A health care insurer that offers a health care insurance plan in the individual market shall comply with the genetic information nondiscrimination requirements established under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-53.

A health care insurer that offers a health care insurance plan in the group market shall comply with the genetic information nondiscrimination requirements established under 42 U.S.C. 300gg-1(b)(3), 42 U.S.C. 300gg-1(c) — (f), and 42 U.S.C. 300gg-91.

In this section,

“group market” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care insurance plan” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

;

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS 21.54.500;

“individual market” has the meaning given in AS

21.51.500

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 55 SLA 2009)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.093

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.485.
Coverage of children.

A health care insurer may not deny enrollment of a child under the health care insurance of the child’s parent on the ground that the child

was born out of wedlock;

is not claimed as a dependent on the parent’s federal income tax return;

does not reside with the parent; or

does not reside in the health care insurer’s service area.

If a parent is required under AS

25.27.020(a)(9)

or

25.27.060(c)

to provide medical support for a child and the parent is eligible for family health care insurance coverage through an insurer, the parent’s health care insurer

shall allow the parent to enroll the child under the family health care insurance coverage without regard to restrictions relating to enrollment periods if the child is otherwise eligible;

shall, if the parent fails to apply for enrollment of a child under (1) of this subsection, enroll the child under the parent’s family health care insurance coverage upon application by the child’s other parent or custodian, the child support services agency, or the Department of Health and Social Services; and

may not disenroll or eliminate health care insurance coverage of the child unless the insurer has received written evidence that

the parent with the insurance coverage is no longer required by court order or administrative order to provide the child’s medical support; or

the child is or will be enrolled in comparable health care insurance coverage through another insurer that will take effect not later than the effective date of the disenrollment or elimination of coverage.

A health care insurer who provides health care insurance coverage of a child through family health care insurance coverage of a parent who does not have sole physical custody of the child shall

provide to the child’s other parent or custodian the information that may be necessary for the child to obtain benefits through the family health care insurance coverage;

allow the child’s other parent or custodian, or the child’s health care provider with the parent’s or custodian’s approval, to submit claims for covered services without the approval of the parent whose health care insurance covers the child; and

make payment on claims submitted under (2) of this subsection directly to the child’s other parent or custodian, the health care provider, or a state agency to which the child’s medical support rights have been assigned under AS

25.27.120

or AS

47.07.025

.

If an individual is covered for health benefits from an insurer, the insurer may not impose requirements on a state agency to which the rights of the individual under AS

25.27.120

or AS

47.07.025

have been assigned that are different from requirements applicable to an agent or assignee of other individuals covered by the insurer.

In this section, “health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

and includes the Comprehensive Health Insurance Association as described in AS

21.55.010

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 102 SLA 1994; am § 33 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 30 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 31 — 34 ch 81 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.095

.
Renumbered in 2010.

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency” was changed to “child support services agency” in (b) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 21.36.490.
Premium financing.

A person licensed under AS 21.27 may not

enter into any insurance transaction in which the premium is financed by other than the licensee unless the person providing the financing is licensed under and in compliance with AS 06.40 or is exempted from licensure under AS

06.40.020

; or

finance premiums or extend credit to persons purchasing insurance except as provided in regulations adopted by the director; the director shall adopt regulations establishing the conditions under which licensees may extend credit or finance premiums except that in no event may the regulations permit a rate of interest on amounts lent or credit extended greater than that provided in AS

06.40.120

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 170 SLA 1978)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.122

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For premium financing, see 3 AAC 23, art. 2.

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

Sec. 21.36.495.
Prompt payment of health care insurance claims.

A health care insurer shall pay or deny indemnities under a health care insurance policy, whether or not services were provided by a participating provider, within 30 calendar days after the insurer or a third-party administrator under contract with the insurer receives a clean claim.

If a health care insurer does not pay or denies a health care insurance claim, the insurer shall give notice to the covered person, or to the provider of the medical care services or supplies if the claim was assigned or if the covered person elected direct payment under AS

21.51.120(a)(2)

or AS

21.54.020(a)

, of the basis for denial or the specific information that is needed for the insurer to adjudicate the claim. The health care insurer shall provide the notice required under this subsection within 30 calendar days after the insurer or third-party administrator under contract with the insurer receives the claim.

If a health care insurer does not provide the notice as required under (b) of this section, the claim is presumed a clean claim, and interest shall accrue at a rate of 15 percent annually beginning on the day following the day that the notice was due and continues to accrue until the date that the claim is paid.

If a health care insurer provides the notice required under (b) of this section and requests specific information that is needed to adjudicate the claim, the insurer shall pay the claim not later than 15 calendar days after receipt of the information specified in the notice or within 30 days after receipt of the claim. If a health care insurer does not pay the claim within the time period required under this subsection, the claim is presumed to be a clean claim, interest at a rate of 15 percent accrues, and interest continues to accrue until the date the claim is paid.

For purposes of (c) and (d) of this section, if only a portion of a claim is covered under the terms of the insurance policy, interest accrues based only on the portion of the claim that is covered.

For the purposes of this section, a claim is considered paid on the day payment is mailed or transmitted electronically.

If interest is accrued on a claim under (c) or (d) of this section, a health care insurer may not include the amount of interest accrued in calculating an applicable limit on benefits payable to a covered person or other person claiming payments under the health insurance policy.

A health care insurer is not required to pay interest due as a result of the application of (c) or (d) of this section if the amount of the interest is $1 or less.

In this section,

“clean claim” means a claim that does not have a defect or impropriety, including a lack of any required substantiating documentation, or a particular circumstance requiring special treatment that prevents timely payment of the claim;

“health care insurer” has the meaning given in AS

21.54.500

.

History.

(§ 32 ch 80 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.128

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.500.
Unfair financial planning practices.

A person may not represent, directly or indirectly, to be a financial planner, investment adviser, consultant, financial counselor, or similar specialist engaged in the business of giving financial planning or advice relating to investments, insurance, real estate, tax matters, or trust and estate matters when the person is in fact only engaging in the sale of insurance.

A person may not engage in the business of financial planning and solicit the sale of a product or service on the basis that the person is an insurance salesperson or that a commission for the sale of an insurance product will be received in addition to a fee for financial planning without full disclosure to the client before the execution of the agreement required in (c) of this section.

A person licensed under this title may not charge a fee other than a commission for financial planning unless the fee is based upon a written agreement signed before the performance of a service under the agreement. The insurance salesperson shall provide the client a copy of the signed agreement at the time of signing. The agreement must specifically state the service for which a fee is to be charged and how the fee will be determined or calculated. The agreement must provide that the client is under no obligation to purchase an insurance product. The licensee shall retain a copy of the agreement for not less than five years after completion of services and the agreement shall be available to the director upon request.

History.

(§ 140 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.145

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.505.
Health discount plans.

A person may not sell, market, promote, advertise, or otherwise distribute a health discount plan unless

each advertisement, policy, document, information, statement, or other communication regarding the health discount plan and the plan itself contain a statement, in bold and prominent type, that the health discount plan is not insurance;

the discounts offered under the health discount plan are specifically authorized by a contract with each provider of the services or supplies listed in conjunction with the plan;

the health discount plan states the name, address, and telephone number of the administrator of the plan;

the person makes readily available to the consumer a complete, accurate, and up-to-date list of providers participating in the plan that offer discounted health care services or supplies in the consumer’s local area and the discounts offered by the providers;

the person provides the consumer the right to cancel the health discount plan within 30 days after purchase of the plan; and

the person provides the consumer with a full refund of all payments made, except for a nominal processing fee, within 30 days after notification of cancellation of the plan under (5) of this subsection.

The director may adopt regulations to implement this section and to establish additional requirements intended to prohibit unfair or deceptive practices relating to health discount plans.

History.

(§ 24 ch 1 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.155

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Sec. 21.36.510.
Nondisclosure of personal financial and personal health information.

The director shall adopt regulations regarding the release of financial and health information regarding an individual who seeks to obtain, obtains, or has obtained an insurance product or service from a licensee that is to be used primarily for personal, family, or household purposes. The regulations must be at least as restrictive as the model regulations adopted under the National Conference of Insurance Legislators Financial Information Privacy Protection Model Act, adopted by the National Conference of Insurance Legislators Executive Committee on November 17, 2000, and amended on March 2, 2001.

History.

(§ 67 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

21.36.162

.
Renumbered in 2010.

Administrative Code. —

For privacy of consumer financial and health information, see 3 AAC 26, art. 5.